Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Mississippi Interagency Council on Homelessness

§ 43-1-101.
Mississippi Interagency Council on Homelessness created; duties and purposes; membership.

There is created the Mississippi Interagency Council on Homelessness. The purpose of the council is to establish, develop and implement a plan to reduce homelessness that includes a strong focus on the needs of homeless children, youth and families, as well as individuals and veterans who are homeless.

In addition to the duties prescribed in subsection (1) the council shall annually make a report to the Governor, the House of Representatives, the Senate and the public regarding the council’s progress in meeting its goals and objectives.

The council shall be composed of the following members:

A representative from the Office of the Governor, appointed by the Governor;

The Chairperson or his designee of the Youth and Family Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives and the Chairperson or his designee of the Housing Committee of the Senate;

The Executive Director of the Department of Health and Human Services or his designee;

The Executive Director of the Department of Mental Health or his designee;

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority or his designee;

The State Superintendent of the Department of Education or his designee;

A representative of Partners to End Homelessness, appointed by the Governor;

A representative of Mississippi United to End Homelessness, appointed by the Governor;

A representative of Open Doors Counseling Center, appointed by the Governor;

A representative of a school district that is working on the McKinney-Vento Homeless Education Assistance Act, appointed by the State Superintendent of Education;

A representative of the Mississippi Campaign to End Child Homelessness, appointed by the Governor;

Two (2) directors from homeless and domestic violence emergency shelters, appointed by the Governor;

A youth who is or has been homeless, appointed by the State Superintendent of Education;

A representative of the Oakley Youth Development Center, appointed by the Governor;

The Executive Director of the State Veterans Affairs Board or his designee;

The Executive Director of Hope Enterprises, or his designee; and

A representative from a community action agency appointed by the Governor.

Appointments shall be made within thirty (30) days after July 1, 2013. Within fifteen (15) days thereafter on a day to be designated jointly by the Speaker of the House and the Lieutenant Governor, the council shall meet and organize by selecting from its membership a chairperson and a vice chairperson. The vice chairperson shall also serve as secretary and shall be responsible for keeping all records of the council. A majority of the members of the council shall constitute a quorum. In the selection of its officers and the adoption of rules, resolutions and reports, an affirmative vote of a majority of the council shall be required. All members shall be notified in writing of all meetings, and those notices shall be mailed at least fifteen (15) days before the date on which a meeting is to be held.

Members of the council shall serve without compensation for their services, and the council shall perform its duties without legislative appropriation or the use of any state funds for that purpose; however, the council, by approval of a majority of the appointed members of the council, is authorized to accept funds that may be donated or provided in the form of financial grants from public or private sources. In addition, any department, division, board, bureau, commission or agency of the state, or of any political subdivision thereof, shall provide, at the request of the chair of the council, such facilities, assistance and data as will enable the council to carry out its duties.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 448, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.